Tennessee, session 114, SB1219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section, "immigration officer" means any state, local, or
federal law enforcement officer who is seeking to enforce immigration law, including, but
not limited to, United States immigration and customs enforcement officers and United
States customs and border protection officers.
(b) Notwithstanding title 4, chapter 42 and title 7, chapter 68, the director of
schools for the LEA or the director of the public charter school shall immediately notify all
students enrolled in the LEA or public charter school, parents of students enrolled in the
LEA or public charter school, and all educators, employees, and contractors of the LEA
or public charter school of the presence of an immigration officer on the grounds of a
public school controlled by the LEA or on the grounds of the public charter school.
(c) Notwithstanding §§ 4-42-102 and 7-68-102, this section and any policy
adopted by a local board of education or public charter school governing body to
effectuate this section is not a sanctuary policy and does not subject a member of the
local board or governing body, director of schools, director of the public charter school,
or any employee of the LEA or public charter school to any penalty prescribed in title 4,
chapter 42 or title 7, chapter 68 for the adoption or enforcement of a sanctuary policy.
SB1219
002891
- 1 -

SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002891